District of Columbia statutes.
42-2434

Private actions.

(a)

In addition to any action by the Attorney General authorized under this chapter and any other action otherwise authorized by law, a homeowner may bring an action for damages incurred, or equitable relief, as the result of a practice prohibited by this chapter.

(b)

A homeowner who brings an action under this chapter and who is awarded damages or equitable relief may also be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(c)

A violation of this chapter shall be a violation of Chapter 39 of Title 28 and all remedies of the chapter shall be available for such action. A private cause of action under the chapter is in the public interest.

(d)

The remedies provided in this section are cumulative and do not restrict any remedy that is otherwise available.

Jan. 29, 2008, D.C. Law 17-87, § 5, 54 DCR 11913